Maryland, session 2025, SB0363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–519.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible seafood processing project” means a project to establish or
expand the business of a licensed seafood dealer that:
(i) supports the goal of increasing the amount of oyster shells
retained in the State and returned to the Chesapeake Bay; and
(ii) meets the criteria established by the Corporation under this
section.
(3) “Licensed seafood dealer” means a person licensed under § 4–701 of the
Natural Resources Article to buy, process, pack, resell, market or otherwise deal in fish
caught in the tidal waters of the State.
(4) “Repletion” means enhancing areas where commercial harvest is
permitted.
– 1 –

Ch. 174 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) “Seasonal full–time job” means a position for which an individual is
required to work a minimum of 420 hours during 12 weeks of a 3–month period.
(b) (1) (i) The Corporation shall provide loans up to $250,000 to finance the
costs of eligible seafood processing projects in accordance with this section, including
historic oyster shucking facilities, not to exceed $25,000 for each full–time job or [$10,000
for each] seasonal full–time job that is projected to be created or retained.
(ii) Beginning 1 year after receipt of a loan under this section, a loan
recipient shall report each year for 3 consecutive years to the Corporation to certify the
number of full–time jobs and seasonal full–time jobs that were created or retained by the
recipient during the previous 12–month period.
(2) Financing provided under this section shall be conditioned on the
agreement by the recipient to comply with the provisions of § 4–1019.2 of the Natural
Resources Article until the loan is repaid.
(3) The Corporation shall forgive any loan provided under this section as
follows:
(i) the current market value as established in § 4–1019.2 of the
Natural Resources Article for each bushel of oyster shells that the loan recipient returns to
the Department of Natural Resources at no cost; or
(ii) $25 for each bushel of spat–on–shell that the person plants on a
public fishery bottom as verified by the Department of Natural Resources.
(c) A person is eligible to receive financing under this section if the person:
(1) (i) has been a licensed seafood dealer for at least [5] 3 years; or
(ii) has held a tidal fish license issued under § 4–701 of the Natural
Resources Article for at least 5 years and agrees to obtain a seafood dealer license on
receiving financing under this section;
(2) has paid all applicable business taxes and fees for the past 5 years;
(3) demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Corporation through a business
plan and pro forma financial projections that, within 5 years after receiving financing under
this section, the person’s seafood processing business will have the potential to achieve
viability as a business;
(4) meets any other eligibility requirements established by the
Corporation; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 174
(5) agrees to the financing terms and conditions established by the
Corporation that are otherwise in conformance with this section.
(d) (1) For fiscal year 2024, the Governor shall include in the annual budget
bill an appropriation of $1,000,000 to the Corporation for the purpose of providing loans
under this section.
(2) The appropriation in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
distributed to a special account to be used only to:
(i) provide loans under this section; and
(ii) pay the costs necessary to administer and operate this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –